lt-LT: Auganti medija forma: Bale; Kvadratas; Plytos; Traškučiai; Skrebučiai; Diskas; Laisvas; Granulės; Kištukas; Milteliai; Substrato plokštė; Kita
pt-BR: Forma de meio de cultura: Fardo; Bloco; Tijolo; Chip; Crouton; Disco; Granel; Pelota; Plugue; Pó; Placa; Outro
da: Vækstmediumform: I dele; Blok; Mursten; Chip; Crouton; Skive; Løs; Piller; Prop; Pulver; Slab; Andet
bg-BG: Форма на растежната среда: Бали; Блокче; Тухла; Чип; Крутон; Дисково; Насипно; Пелети; Торче; Прах; Торфен блок; Друго
sv: Växande media: Bal; Block; Tegel; Chip; Grafikruta; Skiv; Löst; Pellet; Plugg; Pulver; Platta; Övrigt
it: Forma dei substrati di coltura: Balla; Blocco; Mattone; Chip; A cubetti; Disco; Sfuso; Pellet; Presa; Polvere; A lastra; Altro
th: รูปแบบของวัสดุปลูก: แบบอัดก้อน; บล็อก; อิฐ; ชิป; ครูตองซ์; จาน; ชาบดเต็มใบ; เม็ดไม้; ปลั๊ก; แบบผง; แผ่น; อื่นๆ
es: Formato del sustrato: Fardo; Bloquear; Ladrillo; Chip; Cuscurro; Disco; A granel; Pellet; Enchufe; Polvo; Bloque; Otros
fi: Kasvualustan olomuoto: Paali; Lohko; Tiili; Lastu; Kookospala; Levy; Irtonainen; Pelletti; Taimikasvu; Jauhe; Laatta; Muu
tr: Yetiştirme ortamı formu: Balya; Blok; Tuğla; Yonga; Kruton; Disk; Dökme; Pelet; Tıpa; Toz; Plaka; Diğer
vi: Hình thức giá thể trồng: Kiện; Khối; Gạch; Chip; Bánh mì nướng nhỏ dùng kèm xúp; Đĩa; Trà sợi rời; Viên nén; Nút bịt; Bột; Tấm; Khác
de: Form des Wachstumsmediums: Ballen; Block; Ziegel; Chip; Croûton; Scheibe; Lose; Pellet; Stecker; Puder; Block; Sonstiges
en: Growing media form: Bale; Block; Brick; Chip; Crouton; Disc; Loose; Pellet; Plug; Powder; Slab; Other
hr-HR: Oblik medija za uzgoj: Bala; Blok; Cigla; Komadić; Kruton; Disk; U rinfuzi; Pelet; Utikač; Puder; Ploča; Ostalo
ko: 재배 배지 형태: 베일; 블록; 벽돌; 칩; 크루톤; 디스크; 헐렁한; 펠릿; 플러그; 가루; 슬랩; 기타
el: Μορφή υποστρώματος καλλιέργειας: Μπάλα άχυρου; Μπλοκ; Τούβλο; Τσιπς; Κύβοι; Δίσκος; Χύμα; Πέλετ; Τάπα; Σκόνη; Πλάκα; Άλλο
pl: Forma podłoża: Bela; Blok; Kostka; Wiór; Granulat; Krążek; Sypkie; Granulat; Kostka rozsadowa; Proszek; Płyta; Pozostałe
ja: 成育媒体の形態: ベール; ブロック; レンガ; チップ; クルトン; ディスク; ルース; ペレット; プラグ; パウダー; スラブ; その他
ru: Форма субстрата: Тюк; Блок; Брикет; Щепа; Кубики; Диск; Рассыпной; Гранулы; Пробка; Пудра; Плита; Другой
pt-PT: Forma do meio de cultivo: Fardo; Bloco; Tijolo; Lascas; Crouton; Disco; Solto; Péletes; Ficha; Pó; Placa; Outro
cs: Forma pěstebního média: Balík; Bloky; Cihly; Štěpka; Krutony; Disky; Volně ložený substrát; Pelety/tablety; Sadbovací kostky; Prášek; Rohože; Jiné
sk-SK: Forma substrátu: Lisovaný blok; Blok; Tehla; Štep; Krutón; Kotúč; Voľné; Peleta; Zástrčka; Prášok; Plát; Iné
fr: Forme du substrat: Balle; Bloc; Brique; Copeau; Croûton; Disque; En vrac; Granulé; Prise; Poudre; Plaque; Autre
nl: Vorm van groeimedium: Baal; Blok; Baksteen; Chip; Crouton; Schijf; Los; Pellet; Plug; Poeder; Kweekmat; Overig
nb: Vekstmedium-format: Balle; Blokk; Murstein; Chip; Krutoner; Plate; Løs; Pellet; Støpsel; Pulver; Plate; Annet
zh-TW: 栽培介質形式: 草捆; 砌塊; 磚; 碎屑; 丁狀; 圓盤狀; 散裝; 顆粒; 塞物; 粉末; 後板; 其他
ro-RO: Forma substratului de cultură: Balot; Bloc; Cărămidă; Așchii; Cubulețe de vată minerală; Disc; Vrac; Pelete; Dop; Pudră; Placă; Altele
hu: Növekedési közeg formája: Bála; Blokk; Tégla; Lapka; Kruton; Tárcsa; Szálas; Pellet; Dugó; Por; Tömb; Egyéb
zh-CN: 生长介质的形式: 捆包; 块状; 砖状; 片状; 粒状; 盘状; 松散; 颗粒; 育苗块; 粉末; 板状; 其他
sl-SI: Oblika rastnega substrata: Bale; Kocka; Opeka; Čip; Kruton; Disk; Razsuti; Peleti; Vtikač; Prašek; Plošča; Druga